Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article III. Division of Powers.

§ 1. Departments to be distinct.

The legislative, executive, and judicial departments shall be separate and distinct, so that none exercise the powers properly belonging to the others, nor any person exercise the power of more than one of them at the same time; provided, however, administrative agencies may be created by the General Assembly with such authority and duties as the General Assembly may prescribe. Provision may be made for judicial review of any finding, order, or judgment of such administrative agencies.

Cross references.

As to separation of departments, see also Va. Const., Art. I, § 5.

Law Review.

For note on a constitutional analysis of Virginia’s Medical Malpractice Act, see 37 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1192 (1980).

For article, “Legislative and Executive Veto of Rules of Administrative Agencies: Models and Alternatives,” see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 79 (1982).

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For an article, “The Real Separation in Separation of Powers Law,” see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1127 (2000).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Administrative Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2012).

For article “Legislators on Executive-Branch Boards Are Unconstitutional, Period,” see 28 Wm. & Mary Bill of Rts. J. 1 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
1A M.J. Administrative Law, §§ 3, 16.